Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2317
Retirement system;
future service retirement benefit; when payable; how computed; selection of
annuity; board; provide tax information.

(1) The
future service retirement benefit shall be an annuity, payable monthly with
the first payment made no earlier than the annuity start date, which shall
be the actuarial equivalent of the retirement value as specified in section
23-2316 based on factors determined by the board, except that gender shall
not be a factor when determining the amount of such payments pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section.

Except as provided in section 42-1107, at any time before
the annuity start date, the retiring employee may choose to receive his or
her annuity either in the form of an annuity as provided under subsection
(4) of this section or any optional form that is determined by the board.

Except as provided in section 42-1107, in lieu of the future
service retirement annuity, a retiring employee may receive a benefit not
to exceed the amount in his or her employer and employee accounts as of the
date of final account value payable in a lump sum and, if the employee chooses
not to receive the entire amount in such accounts, an annuity equal to the
actuarial equivalent of the remainder of the retirement value, and the employee
may choose any form of such annuity as provided for by the board.

In any case, the amount of the monthly payment shall be such
that the annuity chosen shall be the actuarial equivalent of the retirement
value as specified in section 23-2316 except as provided in this section.

The board shall provide to any county employee who is eligible
for retirement, prior to his or her selecting any of the retirement options
provided by this section, information on the federal and state income tax
consequences of the various annuity or retirement benefit options.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
the monthly income payable to a member retiring on or after January 1, 1984,
shall be as follows:

He or she shall receive at retirement the amount which may
be purchased by the accumulated contributions based on annuity rates in effect
on the annuity start date which do not utilize gender as a factor, except
that such amounts shall not be less than the retirement income which can be
provided by the sum of the amounts derived pursuant to subdivisions (a) and
(b) of this subsection as follows:

(a) The income provided by the accumulated contributions made
prior to January 1, 1984, based on male annuity purchase rates in effect on
the date of purchase; and

(b) The income provided by the accumulated contributions made
on and after January 1, 1984, based on the annuity purchase rates in effect
on the date of purchase which do not use gender as a factor.

(3) Any amount, in excess of contributions, which may be required
in order to purchase the retirement income specified in subsection (2) of
this section shall be withdrawn from the County Equal Retirement Benefit Fund.

(4)(a) The normal form of payment shall be a single life annuity
with five-year certain, which is an annuity payable monthly during the remainder
of the member's life with the provision that, in the event of his or her death
before sixty monthly payments have been made, the monthly payments will be
continued to his or her estate or to the beneficiary he or she has designated
until sixty monthly payments have been made in total. Such annuity shall be
equal to the actuarial equivalent of the member cash balance account or the
sum of the employee and employer accounts, whichever is applicable, as of
the date of final account value. As a part of the annuity, the normal form
of payment may include a two and one-half percent cost-of-living adjustment
purchased by the member, if the member elects such a payment option.

Except as provided in section 42-1107, a member may elect
a lump-sum distribution of his or her member cash balance account as of the
date of final account value upon termination of service or retirement.

For a member employed and participating in the retirement
system prior to January 1, 2003, who has elected to participate in the cash
balance benefit pursuant to section 23-2308.01, or for a member employed and
participating in the retirement system beginning on and after January 1, 2003,
the balance of his or her member cash balance account as of the date of final
account value shall be converted to an annuity using an interest rate used
in the actuarial valuation as recommended by the actuary and approved by the
board.

For an employee who is a member prior to January 1, 2003,
who has elected not to participate in the cash balance benefit pursuant to section
23-2308.01, and who, at the time of retirement, chooses the annuity option
rather than the lump-sum option, his or her employee and employer accounts
as of the date of final account value shall be converted to an annuity using
an interest rate that is equal to the lesser of (i) the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation
initial interest rate for valuing annuities for terminating plans as of the
beginning of the year during which payment begins plus three-fourths of one
percent or (ii) the interest rate used in the actuarial valuation as recommended
by the actuary and approved by the board.

(b) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2003, and each
calendar year thereafter, the actuary for the board shall perform an actuarial
valuation of the system using the entry age actuarial cost method. Under this
method, the actuarially required funding rate is equal to the normal cost
rate plus the contribution rate necessary to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability on a level-payment basis. The normal cost under this method
shall be determined for each individual member on a level percentage of salary
basis. The normal cost amount is then summed for all members. The initial
unfunded actual accrued liability as of January 1, 2003, if any, shall be
amortized over a twenty-five-year period. During each subsequent actuarial
valuation, changes in the unfunded actuarial accrued liability due to changes
in benefits, actuarial assumptions, the asset valuation method, or actuarial
gains or losses shall be measured and amortized over a twenty-five-year period
beginning on the valuation date of such change. If the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability under the entry age actuarial cost method is zero or less
than zero on an actuarial valuation date, then all prior unfunded actuarial
accrued liabilities shall be considered fully funded and the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability shall be reinitialized and amortized over a twenty-five-year
period as of the actuarial valuation date. If the actuarially required contribution
rate exceeds the rate of all contributions required pursuant to the County
Employees Retirement Act, there shall be a supplemental appropriation sufficient
to pay for the difference between the actuarially required contribution rate
and the rate of all contributions required pursuant to the act.

(c) If the unfunded accrued actuarial liability under the
entry age actuarial cost method is less than zero on an actuarial valuation
date, and on the basis of all data in the possession of the retirement board,
including such mortality and other tables as are recommended by the actuary
engaged by the retirement board and adopted by the retirement board, the retirement
board may elect to pay a dividend to all members participating in the cash
balance option in an amount that would not increase the actuarial contribution
rate above ninety percent of the actual contribution rate. Dividends shall
be credited to the employee cash balance account and the employer cash balance
account based on the account balances on the actuarial valuation date. In
the event a dividend is granted and paid after the actuarial valuation date,
interest for the period from the actuarial valuation date until the dividend
is actually paid shall be paid on the dividend amount. The interest rate shall
be the interest credit rate earned on regular contributions.

(5) At the option of the retiring member, any lump sum or
annuity provided under this section or section 23-2334 may be deferred to
commence at any time, except that no benefit shall be deferred later than
April 1 of the year following the year in which the employee has both attained
at least seventy and one-half years of age and has terminated his or her employment
with the county, except that for members participating in the defined contribution
benefit, no distribution is required to be made for the plan year commencing
January 1, 2009, through December 31, 2009. Such election by the retiring
member may be made at any time prior to the commencement of the lump-sum or
annuity payments.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 17, p. 407;

Laws 1979, LB 416, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 462, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 210, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 347, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 60, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 543, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 417, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 15;

Laws 2002, LB 687, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 1019, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB328, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB188, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB916, § 9.
April 7, 2012